Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HARMONY-CALEDONIA BIKE TRAIL.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $14,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of natural resources for acquisition of property and easements, predesign, and design of a bike trail from the city of Harmony to the city of Caledonia following marked Trunk Highway 44 and marked U.S. Highway 52 and routed through the cities of Canton, Mabel, and Spring Grove. This appropriation is for Phase 1 of the project. new text end new text begin (b) Any unspent portion of this appropriation remaining after completion of the project in paragraph (a), after written notice to the commissioner of management and budget, is available for engineering and construction of the bike trail. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $14,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end